pt-BR: Padrão de largura do rack: 10 polegadas; 19 polegadas; 21 polegadas (ETSI 450 mm); 23 polegadas; 24 polegadas; 30 polegadas; Personalizada; Outro
lt-LT: Stovo pločio standartas: 10 colių; 19 colių; 21 colis (ETSI 450 mm); 23 coliai; 24 coliai; 30 colių; Pasirinktinis; Kita
zh-CN: 机架宽度标准: 10 英寸; 19 英寸; 21 英寸（ETSI 450 毫米）; 23 英寸; 24 英寸; 30 英寸; 定制; 其他
nl: Standaard rackbreedte: 10 inch; 19 inch; 21 inch (ETSI 450 mm); 23 inch; 24 inch; 30 inch; Aangepast; Andere
fr: Largeur de rack standard: 10 pouces; 19 pouces; 21 pouces (ETSI 450 mm); 23 pouces; 24 pouces; 30 pouces; Personnalisé; Autre
ko: 랙 너비 표준: 10인치; 19인치; 21인치 (ETSI 450mm); 23인치; 24인치; 30인치; 커스텀; 기타
es: Estándar de ancho de rack: 10 pulgadas; 19 pulgadas; 21 pulgadas (ETSI 450 mm); 23 pulgadas; 24 pulgadas; 30 pulgadas; Personalizado; Otros
nb: Stativbreddestandard: 10-tommer; 19-tommer; 21-tommer (ETSI 450 mm); 23-tommer; 24-tommer; 30-tommer; Tilpasset; Annet
sv: Rackbreddsstandard: 10-tum; 19-tum; 21-tum (ETSI 450 mm); 23-tum; 24-tum; 30-tum; Anpassad; Övrigt
sl-SI: Standard širine stojala: 10-palčni; 19-palčni; 21-palčni (ETSI 450 mm); 23-palčni; 24-palčni; 30-palčni; Po meri; Drugo
th: มาตรฐานความกว้างแร็ค: 10 นิ้ว; 19 นิ้ว; 21 นิ้ว (ETSI 450 มม.); 23 นิ้ว; 24 นิ้ว; 30 นิ้ว; ปรับเข้ารูป; อื่นๆ
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chiều rộng giá đỡ: 10 inch; 19 inch; 21 inch (ETSI 450 mm); 23 inch; 24 inch; 30 inch; Tùy chỉnh; Khác
tr: Raf genişlik standardı: 10 inç; 19 inç; 21 inç (ETSI 450 mm); 23 inç; 24 inç; 30 inç; Özel; Diğer
zh-TW: 機架寬度標準: 10 吋; 19 吋; 21 吋 (ETSI 450 公釐); 23 吋; 24 吋; 30 吋; 客製化; 其他
bg-BG: Стандарт за ширина на стойката: 10 инча; 19 инча; 21 инча (ETSI 450 мм); 23 инча; 24 инча; 30 инча; Персонализиран; Други
pt-PT: Padrão de largura do rack: 10 polegadas; 19 polegadas; 21 polegadas (ETSI 450 mm); 23 polegadas; 24 polegadas; 30 polegadas; À medida; Outro
hr-HR: Standard širine nosača: 10 inča; 19 inča; 21 inč (ETSI 450 mm); 23 inča; 24 inča; 30 inča; Prilagođeni; Ostalo
pl: Standard szerokości szafy rack: 10 cali; 19 cali; 21 cali (ETSI 450 mm); 23 cale; 24 cale; 30 cali; Niestandardowe terminy; Inne
de: Rack-Breitenstandard: 10 Zoll; 19 Zoll; 21 Zoll (ETSI 450 mm); 23 Zoll; 24 Zoll; 30 Zoll; Maßgeschneidert; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Standard lățime raft: 10 inci; 19 inci; 21 inci (ETSI 450 mm); 23 inci; 24 inci; 30 inci; Personalizat; Altele
en: Rack width standard: 10-inch; 19-inch; 21-inch (ETSI 450 mm); 23-inch; 24-inch; 30-inch; Custom; Other
da: Rack-breddestandard: 10-tommer; 19-tommer; 21-tommer (ETSI 450 mm); 23-tommer; 24-tommer; 30-tommer; Skræddersyet; Andet
el: Πρότυπο πλάτους ραφιού: 10 ιντσών; 19 ιντσών; 21 ιντσών (ETSI 450 χιλ.); 23 ιντσών; 24 ιντσών; 30 ιντσών; Custom; Άλλο
it: Standard di larghezza del rack: 10 pollici; 19 pollici; 21 pollici (ETSI 450 mm); 23 pollici; 24 pollici; 30 pollici; Personalizzato; Altro
cs: Standard šířky racku: 10 palců; 19 palců; 21 palců (ETSI 450 mm); 23 palců; 24 palců; 30 palců; Vlastní; Jiné
fi: Telineen leveysstandardi: 10 tuumaa; 19 tuumaa; 21 tuumaa (ETSI 450 mm); 23 tuumaa; 24 tuumaa; 30 tuumaa; Mukautettu; Muu
ru: Стандарт ширины стойки: 10 дюймов; 19 дюймов; 21 дюйм (ETSI 450 мм); 23 дюйма; 24 дюйма; 30 дюймов; Индивидуальный; Другой
sk-SK: Štandard šírky nosiča: 10-palcový; 19-palcový; 21-palcový (ETSI 450 mm); 23-palcový; 24-palcový; 30-palcový; Prispôsobený; Iné
hu: Állványszélesség szabványa: 10 hüvelykes; 19 hüvelykes; 21 hüvelykes (ETSI 450 mm); 23 hüvelykes; 24 hüvelykes; 30 hüvelykes; Egyedi; Egyéb
ja: ラック幅標準: 10インチ; 19インチ; 21インチ (ETSI 450mm); 23インチ; 24インチ; 30インチ; カスタム; その他